Washington statutes.
RCW 15.80.450

Weighmaster's license—Applications—Fee.

(1) Any person may apply to the director for a weighmaster's license. Such application shall be on a form prescribed by the director and shall include:

(a) The full name of the person applying for such license and, if the applicant is a partnership, association, or corporation, the full name of each member of the partnership or the names of the officers of the association or corporation;

(b) The principal business address of the applicant in this state and elsewhere;

(c) The names and addresses of the persons authorized to receive and accept service of summons and legal notice of all kinds for the applicant;

(d) The location of each scale subject to the applicant's control and from which certified weights will be issued;

(e) The state unified business identifier number for the operator of the scale; and

(f) Such other information as the director identifies as necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter and adopts by rule.

(2) Such annual application shall be accompanied by a license fee of eighty dollars for each scale from which certified weights will be issued.

[ 2017 c 158 s 4; 2006 c 358 s 3; 1969 ex.s. c 100 s 16.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2006 c 358: See note following RCW 19.94.175.